Utah statutes.
38-7-7.   Interest of hospital in claim settlement limited.
Nothing in this act shall be construed to permit any hospital to be a party to
or to have any interest in the amount or manner of any settlement of any claim
on which a lien has been filed other than the lien rights as provided in this
act.
